Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.015

Access to career and technical course waiver.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction may grant a waiver from the provisions of RCW 28A.230.010(2) based on an application from a board of directors of a school district with fewer than two thousand students.

(2) The state board of education may adopt rules establishing the criteria to evaluate the need for a waiver or waivers under this section.

[ 2018 c 177 s 504.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2018 c 177 ss 201, 202, 501-504, 507, and 701: See note following RCW 28A.150.222.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.